District of Columbia statutes.
2-1403.03

Establishment of procedure for complaints filed against District government.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish rules of procedure for the investigation, conciliation, and hearing of administrative complaints filed against District government agencies, officials and employees alleging violations of this chapter. The final administrative determination in such matters shall be made by the Mayor or his designee.

(b)

A person claiming to be aggrieved by an unlawful discriminatory practice on the part of District government agencies, officials, or employees may elect to file an administrative complaint under the rules of procedure established by the Mayor under this section or a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction under § 2-1403.16.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title III, § 303, 24 DCR 6038
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-189, § 2(h), 49 DCR 6523
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105,§ 28, 51 DCR 881
D.C. Law 15-105 validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 14-189, designated the section as subsec. (a); added subsec. (b); and rewrote the newly designated subsec. (a) which had read as follows: “Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the Mayor shall establish rules of procedure for the investigation, conciliation, and hearing of complaints filed against District government agencies, officials and employees alleging violations of this chapter. The final determination in such matters shall be made by the Mayor or his designee.”
1973 Ed., § 6-2283.
1981 Ed., § 1-2543.
This section is referenced in § 1-624.08, § 2-1403.04, and § 2-1403.16.
Administration, merit system, reductions-in-force, selection of position to be abolished, review procedure, see § 1-624.08.